California, session 20252026, SB1371.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 53064.3 is added to the Government Code, to read:53064.3. (a) To promote the public health, safety, and general welfare, a franchise contract, license, or permit for solid waste handling services that is entered into or substantially amended by a local agency on or after January 1, 2027, shall not include a force majeure provision that excuses or suspends the service provider’s obligation to perform under the franchise contract, license, or permit in the event of a work stoppage arising out of or in connection with a labor dispute.(b) Any force majeure provision in a franchise contract, license, or permit for solid waste handling services is void and unenforceable, regardless of the date on which the contract, license, or permit was entered into, to the extent that it excuses or suspends performance due to a work stoppage arising out of or in connection with a labor dispute is void and unenforceable, regardless of the date on which the contract, license, or permit was entered into. dispute.(c)A local agency shall not issue, and an employer shall not request, induce, rely upon, or cause to be issued, a sanitation, health, or safety order, directive, or determination for the purpose or effect of compelling the performance of work during a lawful labor dispute involving solid waste handling services, except as provided in subdivision (d).(d)A sanitation, health, or safety order, directive, or determination may require the performance of services during a labor dispute only if all of the following conditions are satisfied:(1)The order, directive, or determination is issued pursuant to the independent exercise of the issuing agency’s statutory authority and not at the request, direction, or urging of the employer that is a party to the labor dispute.(2)The order, directive, or determination is issued in writing by the agency head or the agency’s designated health or safety officer.(3)The order, directive, or determination includes specific written findings establishing the existence of an imminent and substantial threat to public health or safety that cannot be reasonably abated through alternatives that do not require the performance of work by employees engaged in the labor dispute.(4)The scope and duration of the required services are limited to those strictly necessary to abate the identified threat.(5)The employer provides written notice of the order, directive, or determination to the exclusive bargaining representative contemporaneously with receipt of the order, directive, or determination.(e)(c) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:(1) “Solid waste handling services” has the same meaning as “solid waste handling” as defined in Section 40195 of the Public Resources Code.(2) “Substantially amended” means a mutually agreed upon change to a majority of the material terms of a franchise contract, license, or permit for solid waste handling services.(3) “Labor dispute” has the same meaning as defined in clause (iii) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 527.3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.SEC. 2. The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.SEC. 3. The Legislature finds and declares that the uninterrupted provision of solid waste handling services during labor disputes, and the prevention of misuse of emergency sanitation, health, or safety authority to interfere with lawful labor activity, are matters of statewide concern and are not municipal affairs as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, Section 1 of this act adding Section 53064.3 to the Government Code applies to all cities, including charter cities.SEC. 4. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.